District of Columbia statutes.
7-1710

Smoking prohibitions pursuant to existing law.

Nothing in this subchapter shall make lawful smoking in any place in which smoking is prohibited pursuant to § 6-1401 et seq., § 35-251(b), or any other District of Columbia or federal law.

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-22, § 12
as added Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-100, § 2(j), 35 DCR 1182
1981 Ed., § 6-920.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 3-22, the District of Columbia Smoking Restriction Act of 1979, see Mayor’s Order 90-192, December 13, 1990.